Tennessee statutes. Title 57 Intoxicating Liquors
Part 1

Commission Creation, Membership, and Employees

57-1-101. “Commission” defined.

Whenever the word “commission” appears in the context of this chapter, the same means and refers to the alcoholic beverage commission.

Acts 1963, ch. 257, § 11; T.C.A., § 57-819.

Law Reviews.

Selected Tennessee Legislation of 1986, 54 Tenn. L. Rev. 457 (1987).

57-1-102. Alcoholic beverage commission created — Appointment.

There is hereby created and established the alcoholic beverage commission, which shall consist of three (3) members, to be appointed by the governor. One (1) member of the commission shall be appointed and reside in each grand division of the state. The members comprising the commission shall not be less than thirty (30) years of age, and shall have been residents and citizens of this state for at least five (5) years preceding their appointment. In making appointments to the commission, the governor shall strive to ensure that at least one (1) person serving on the commission is sixty (60) years of age or older and that at least one (1) person serving on the commission is a member of a racial minority.

Notwithstanding § 3-6-304 or any other law to the contrary, and in addition to all other requirements for membership on the commission:

Any person registered as a lobbyist pursuant to the registration requirements of title 3, chapter 6, who is subsequently appointed or otherwise named as a member of the commission shall terminate all employment and business association as a lobbyist with any entity whose business endeavors or professional activities are regulated by the commission, prior to serving as a member of the commission. This subdivision (b)(1)(A) shall apply to all persons appointed or otherwise named to the commission after July 1, 2010;

No person who is a member of the commission shall be permitted to register or otherwise serve as a lobbyist pursuant to title 3, chapter 6, for any entity whose business endeavors or professional activities are regulated by the commission during such person's period of service as a member of the commission. This subdivision (b)(1)(B) applies to all persons appointed or otherwise named to the commission after July 1, 2010, and to all persons serving on the commission on such date who are not registered as lobbyists; and

No person who serves as a member of the commission shall be employed as a lobbyist by any entity whose business endeavors or professional activities are regulated by the commission for one (1) year following the date such person's service on the commission ends. This subdivision (b)(1)(C) applies to members serving on the commission as of July 1, 2010, and to all members appointed to the commission subsequent to such date.

A person who violates this subsection (b) shall be subject to the penalties prescribed in title 3, chapter 6.

The bureau of ethics and campaign finance is authorized to promulgate rules and regulations to effectuate the purposes of this subsection (b). All such rules and regulations shall be promulgated in accordance with the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act, compiled in title 4, chapter 5, and in accordance with the procedure for initiating and proposing rules by the ethics commission to the bureau of ethics and campaign finance as prescribed in § 4-55-103.

Acts 1963, ch. 257, § 1; T.C.A., § 57-801; Acts 1987, ch. 70, § 1; 1988, ch. 1013, § 25; 2010, ch. 1118, § 3.

Compiler's Notes. The alcoholic beverage commission created by this section, terminates June 30, 2021. See §§4-29-112,4-29-242.

Cross-References. Grand divisions, title 4, ch. 1, part 2.

57-1-103. Terms — Vacancy — Removal — Compensation — Attendance.

The three (3) members of the commission appointed by the governor must be appointed for terms concurrent with the term of the governor. In the event a vacancy occurs, the governor shall appoint a person to fill the vacancy for the unexpired term.

The commissioners serve at the pleasure of the governor and are subject to removal by the governor at any time.

Each member of the commission must receive five hundred dollars ($500) for each meeting of the commission that the member attends. The members of the commission must likewise be reimbursed for their actual and necessary expenses incurred in connection with their official duties. All reimbursement for travel expenses must be in accordance with the comprehensive travel regulations as promulgated by the department of finance and administration and approved by the attorney general and reporter.

A member of the commission who misses more than fifty percent (50%) of the scheduled meetings in a calendar year must be removed as a member of the commission.

The chair of the commission shall promptly notify the governor of any member who fails to satisfy the attendance requirement as prescribed in subdivision (d)(1).

Acts 1963, ch. 257, § 2; 1976, ch. 806, § 1(12); T.C.A., § 57-802; Acts 1988, ch. 867, § 1; 2018, ch. 933, § 6.

Amendments. The 2018 amendment, in (a) in the first sentence, substituted “appointed by the governor must” for “shall” and inserted “the” preceding “governor” at the end, substituted “a person” for “some person” in the second sentence; rewrote (b) which read: “The governor shall have authority to remove any member from the commission only for cause, including misfeasance and nonfeasance, after first delivering to the member a copy of the charges against the member.”; in (c), rewrote the first sentence which read: “The members of the commission shall receive annual compensation in the sum of six thousand dollars ($6,000) per year, which shall be payable in monthly installments out of the treasury of the state of Tennessee.”, in the second sentence, deleted “The members” at the beginning, and added “that the member attends” at the end, in the third sentence, added “The members of the commission must” at the beginning, deleted “shall” preceding “likewise” and substituted “must” for “shall”; and added (d).

Effective Dates. Acts 2018, ch. 933, § 7. July 1, 2018.

57-1-104. Name and domicile — Meetings — Quorum.

The official name of the commission shall be the Tennessee alcoholic beverage commission and its official domicile shall be in Nashville. All meetings of the commission shall be held in Nashville.

The commission shall elect one (1) of its own members as chair, and the commission shall meet at least one (1) time in Nashville each month, and shall hold such other meetings for any period of time as may be necessary for the commission to transact and perform its official duties and functions. The commission may hold a special meeting at any time it deems necessary and advisable in the performance of its official duties. Two (2) members of the commission shall constitute a quorum for the transaction of any business, or in the performance of any duty, power or function of the commission. A special meeting may be called by the chair, or by a majority of the commission.

Acts 1963, ch. 257, § 3; T.C.A., § 57-803.

57-1-105. Director — Salary — Qualifications — Duties — Assistant director.

The commission is hereby authorized to appoint a director to serve at the pleasure of the commission. The director's salary shall be fixed by the commission with the approval of the appropriate state officials as now required by law. The office of the director shall be at Nashville.

The director shall be at least thirty (30) years of age, and shall have been a citizen and resident of this state for at least five (5) years prior to appointment. The director shall be licensed to practice law in this state. The director shall be designated as director, alcoholic beverage commission.

The director shall be the chief administrative officer of the commission and all personnel employed by the commission shall be under the director's direct supervision. The director shall be solely responsible to the commission for the administration and enforcement of this chapter and shall be responsible for the performance of all duties and functions delegated by the commission.

The director shall keep and be responsible for all records of the commission and shall also serve as secretary of the commission. The director shall prepare and keep the minutes of all meetings held by the commission, including a record of all business transacted and decisions rendered by the commission.

The commission is hereby authorized to appoint an assistant director who shall perform such duties and functions which may be assigned by the director or the commission. The assistant director, if licensed to practice law in this state, may also be designated by the commission to sit, act and serve as a hearing officer and when designated as a hearing officer, the assistant director shall be authorized to perform the same duties and functions as the regular hearing officer is now authorized under this chapter and title.

The director and assistant director shall be reimbursed for travel expenses in accordance with the comprehensive travel regulations as promulgated by the department of finance and administration and approved by the attorney general and reporter.

Acts 1963, ch. 257, § 4; 1970, ch. 452, § 1; 1976, ch. 806, § 1(12); T.C.A., § 57-804.

Attorney General Opinions. Discrimination, OAG 89-73 1989 Tenn. AG LEXIS 55 (5/3/89).

57-1-106. Hearing officer — Service of process.

The director shall act and serve as hearing officer when designated by the commission and shall perform such duties as hearing officer as now authorized under this chapter.

In any action or suit brought against the members of the commission in their official capacity in a court of competent jurisdiction, to review any decision or order issued by the commission, service of process issued against the commission may in their absence be lawfully served or accepted by the director on behalf of the commission as though the members of the commission were personally served with process.

Acts 1963, ch. 257, § 5; T.C.A., § 57-805.

57-1-107. Chief law enforcement officer — Appointment — Qualifications — Travel expenses.

The commission is hereby authorized to appoint a chief law enforcement officer who shall serve at the pleasure of the commission. The chief law enforcement officer shall:

Be under the immediate supervision of the director;

Be at least thirty (30) years of age;

Have been a citizen and resident of this state for at least five (5) years prior to appointment;

Have had experience and training in law enforcement work and qualifications identical to that required for members of the Tennessee bureau of investigation; and

Be reimbursed for travel expenses in accordance with the comprehensive travel regulations as promulgated by the department of finance and administration and approved by the attorney general and reporter.

Acts 1963, ch. 257, § 6; 1976, ch. 806, § 1(12); T.C.A., § 57-806.

57-1-108. Interests precluding appointment to or employment by commission.

No person shall be eligible to be appointed as a member of the commission, and no person shall be employed in any capacity by the commission, if such person shall have any interest, financial or otherwise, either direct or indirect, in any distillery, wholesale dealer or retail dealer licensed as such in this state. No family member, including spouse, child or children, father or mother, niece or nephew by blood or marriage, son-in-law or daughter-in-law, shall be employed by any distillery, wholesale dealer or retail dealer, nor shall any family member hold or have issued to them any alcoholic beverage license in this state.

No such person shall have interest of any kind in any building, fixtures, or in the premises occupied by any person, firm or corporation licensed under this chapter.

No such person shall own any stock, nor shall have any interest of any kind, direct or indirect, pecuniary or otherwise, by a loan, mortgage, gift, seeking a loan, or guaranteeing the payment of any loan, in any distillery, wholesale dealer or retail dealer licensed under this chapter.

This section shall not apply to server permits issued under § 57-3-704.

Acts 1963, ch. 257, § 7; T.C.A., § 57-807; 2017, ch. 147, § 1.

Attorney General Opinions. Conflicts of interest, commission members, OAG 94-062, 1994 Tenn. AG LEXIS 65 (4/20/94).

57-1-109. Commissioners prohibited from accepting gifts or bribes — Conspiracy — Penalty.

No member of the commission and no person employed by the commission shall accept any gift, favor, merchandise, donation, contribution, or any article or thing of value, from any person, firm or corporation licensed under this chapter.

No such person shall conspire with any other person to violate this section or attempt to violate this section.

Any person violating this section shall be dismissed and discharged from employment or position, and as a consequence such person shall forfeit any pay or compensation which might be due.

A violation of this section is a Class C misdemeanor.

Acts 1963, ch. 257, § 8; T.C.A., § 57-808; Acts 1989, ch. 591, § 113.

Cross-References. Banks or affiliates of banks, unlawful receipt of gratuity or compensation, §45-2-1704.

Penalty for Class C misdemeanor, §40-35-111.

57-1-110. Offering gifts or bribes to commissioners — Penalty.

When any distillery, wholesaler or retailer licensed under this chapter, or any person employed by any such distillery, wholesaler or retailer, violates, conspires with any other person to violate, or attempts to violate §57-1-109, it is the mandatory duty of the commission to revoke such person's license and permit.

Acts 1963, ch. 257, § 9; T.C.A., § 57-809.

57-1-111. Full-time employment.

The director, the chief law enforcement officer and all other law enforcement personnel shall be employed only on a full-time basis.

Acts 1963, ch. 257, § 10; T.C.A., § 57-810; Acts 2012, ch. 968, § 6.

Cross-References. Duties of secretary of state, §8-3-104.

57-1-112. “Licensed retailer”, “retailer” or “retail licensee” to include retail food store wine licensees.

As used in §§57-1-110,57-3-406(b) and (g) and57-3-204(c), “licensed retailer”, “retailer” or “retail licensee” shall be construed to include and apply to retail food stores which have been issued a retail food store wine license.

Acts 2014, ch. 554, § 4.